Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1106
Recognizance forfeited; when.

When there is a breach of condition of a recognizance, the court shall declare a forfeiture of the bail.

Laws 1953, c. 88, § 1, p. 259.

When the defendant failed to appear in court as his bond required, the liability on the bond became absolute and forfeiture was proper. State v. Hart, 198 Neb. 164, 252 N.W.2d 139 (1977).

Bail bond was properly forfeited where defendant absconded during trial of case. State v. Reed, 178 Neb. 370, 133 N.W.2d 591 (1965).

Action of district court in entering judgment in excess of penalty on bond did not deprive court of jurisdiction. State v. Morse, 171 Neb. 87, 105 N.W.2d 572 (1960).

On breach of condition of recognizance, court should declare forfeiture. State v. Konvalin, 165 Neb. 499, 86 N.W.2d 361 (1957); State v. Honey, 165 Neb. 494, 86 N.W.2d 187 (1957).

Appeal bond properly forfeited where defendant breached condition that he not violate the law. Trial court did not abuse its discretion by prescribing that the defendant not violate the law as a condition of the appeal bond. State v. Hernandez, 1 Neb. App. 830, 511 N.W.2d 535 (1993).